Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3908
Operator, owner, or lessee; ensure
compliance.

An
operator, an owner of a tanning facility, or a lessee of a tanning facility
shall ensure that the tanning facility complies with all applicable federal
laws and regulations and the Indoor Tanning Facility Act.

Laws 2014, LB132, § 8.